Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3297
Deductible, defined.

Deductible shall mean the amount an enrollee is responsible to pay out of pocket before the health maintenance organization begins to pay the costs associated with treatment.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 6.